test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tiie_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tīe: # Noun 15 'eng work/est töö/fin' - full paradigm
     tīe+N+Sg+Nom: tīe
     tīe+N+Sg+Gen: tīe
     tīe+N+Sg+Par: tīedõ
     tīe+N+Sg+Dat: tīen
     tīe+N+Sg+Ins: tīekõks
     tīe+N+Sg+Ill: [tīʼezõ, tīezõ]
     tīe+N+Sg+Ela: tīestõ
     tīe+N+Pl+Nom: tīed
     tīe+N+Pl+Gen: tīed
     tīe+N+Pl+Par: tēḑi
     tīe+N+Pl+Dat: tīedõn
     tīe+N+Pl+Ins: tīedkõks
     tīe+N+Pl+Ill: [tēʼži, tēži]
     tīe+N+Pl+Ela: tēšti
